Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3741
First purchaser, defined.

First purchaser shall mean any person, public or private corporation, association, partnership, or limited liability company buying, accepting for shipment, or otherwise acquiring dry beans from a grower and shall include, but not be limited to, a mortgagee, pledgee, lienor, or other person having a claim against the grower when the actual or constructive possession of such dry beans is taken as part payment or in satisfaction of the mortgage, pledge, lien, or claim.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 74.